AGRICULTURAL
ECONOMICS

ELSEVIER

Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172
www.elsevier.com/locate/agecon

Global models applied to agricultural and trade policies:
a review and assessment
Frank van Tongeren a, Hans van Meijl a, Yves Surry b, *
b

a Agricultural Economics Research Institue (LEI), P.O. Box 29703, 2502 LS The Hague, The Netherlands
Institut National de Ia Recherche Agronomique (INRA}, Unite d'Economie et de Sociologie Rurales de Rennes,
Rue Adolphe Bobierre, CS61 103, 35011 Rennes Cedex, France

Received 2 February 2000; received in revised form 12 July 2000; accepted 21 August 2000

Abstract
The continuing process of global integration bears implications for farmers and related supplying and processing industries
in all parts of the world, but also for the rest of the world economy. An assessment of agricultural and trade policy impacts is
bound to be complex and is often supported by quantitative modeling analysis. This article provides an assessment of the present
state of applied modelling in the area of trade and agricultural policies. We provide in this paper a comparative assessment of
alternative modelling approaches, considering a total of 16 partial equilibrium and general equilibrium models. The assessment
includes theoretical modelling foundations, datasets employed and institutional aspects, such as model maintenance and
dissemination of results. A typology of models is provided by structuring the assessment along a clear set of evaluation
criteria.© 2001 Elsevier Science B.V. All rights reserved.
Keywords: Global modelling; Agriculture; Trade

1. Introduction
The 1990s have witnessed a growing interdependence of national economies. This global trend even
accelerated since the signing of the Uruguay Round
Trade agreement in Marrakech in 1994. Signs of this
increasing globalisation of the world economy take
several forms. World trade and foreign direct investment (FDI) have grown at a faster pace in the nineties
than in the previous decade (WTO, 1998). Financial
markets are more and more interrelated on a world
wide scale and any shocks occurring in one finan*Corresponding author. Tel.: +33-2-2348-5390;
fax: +33-2-2348-5380.
E-mail addresses: f.w.vantongeren@lei.wag-ur.nl
(F. van Tongeren), surry@roazhon.inra.fr (Y. Surry).

cial place have repercussions elsewhere in the world.
Another sign of this world globalisation is the ongoing
creation of regional trade agreements and a consolidation of existing ones. On the policy side, globalisation
of the world economy led policy makers, governments
and international institutions to tackle global policy
issues such as global warming and transboundary environmental problems and come up with some real
policy proposals. This awareness among policy makers also manifests itself in the trade policy area with a
global consensus to launch a new round of trade policy
negotiations despite a bad start at Seattle in November
1999.
This overall trend of globalisation of economic
activity and simultaneously a global orientation of
policy discussions is continuing to represent an enormous challenge for economists. Assessments of such

0169-5150/011$- see front matter© 2001 Elsevier Science B.V. All rights reserved.
PII: S0169-5150(00)00109-2

150

F. van Tongeren et aLl Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

phenomena has required the development of global
economic models. Such effort in global modelling is
now well established and has become an integrated
part of the economics field. Furthermore, the development of such models has been facilitated by the
rapid improvement in information and communication
technologies (ICT). In parallel with the globalisation
of economic activity and policy making, economics
research is globalising as well. Large scale global
models are increasingly supported by international
teams and international groups of stakeholders.
The purpose of this article is to review the present
state of applied modelling used to examine the global
impacts of agricultural and trade policies. Although
the scope of this review is limited by a deliberate bias
towards agricultural trade issues, we should also not
lose sight that, nowadays, many global phenomena
go beyond agricultural and trade policy issues, some
of which are environmentally related. This led us to
adopt an open-minded strategy in conducting this review of global models. More specifically, we reviewed
not only global models with an exclusive agricultural
and trade policy focus but also looked at models which
may also be used to assess other global problems such
as global macroeconomic and environmental issues.
The continuing process of global integration bears
implications, not only, for farmers and related supplying and processing industries in all parts of the
world, but also for the rest of the world economy.
An assessment of likely policy impacts is bound to
be complex and should be supported by quantitative
modeling analysis that explicit the relations of countries between each other, and that explicit relevant
interactions between the agricultural sectors and the
rest of the economy.
There is no model which can serve all purposes.
The choice of theoretical framework, the extent of
regional and sectoral desegregation and the choice
of datasets and estimation methods determine the
domain of applicability of the model. Potential users
of applied models should be aware of strengths and
weaknesses of alternative approaches. This review
primarily presents factual information about relevant
models, and presents this information in a structured
format so as to highlight common features, differences
and areas of applicability of modelling approaches. In
this way we hope to assist the model user in making
his own assessment.

Table 1 lists the sixteen models discussed in this
review, their initiating bodies (institutions and/or
persons) and their current status. A first distinction
in Table 1 is that between partial equilibrium models focusing on agriculture on the one hand, and
economy-wide models on the other hand. These latter
global models are designed in such a way that they
could address agricultural and trade policy issues but
also other global problems such as global macroeconomic and environmental ones. A large part of these
models are still operational and are currently used
for policy- and outlook analysis. For these reasons,
they are in a continuous state of flux of evolving
through successive updates and changes. This situation led us to conduct the model review at a point
of time (early 1999) and provide a snapshot of all
these models as they functioned at the beginning of
1999. Changes that could have occurred to the operational models since this date are not considered
in this article. Information on the individual models
has been gathered using published papers and journal
articles, unpublished working documents, electronic
www/documents and personal contacts. An annex to
this article, which is available on request, provides a
detailed description of each of the models reviewed.
The requirement that the model should be relatively
recent and likely to be used in the 1990s has led us to
exclude important precursors such as the IIASA Basic
Linked System (Parikh et al., 1988), The GOL model
developed by USDA-ERS (Roningen and Liu, 1983),
OECD's MTM model (Huff and Moreddu, 1990)
and the Tyers-Anderson model (Tyers and Anderson,
1992). We have also excluded single-commodity trade
models and linear (or non-linear) programming models that attempt to describe input-output relationships
for a certain production process in great detail.
Although this review of global models has an agricultural and trade policy focus, it does not pretend to
be exhaustive. The authors are well aware that some
global models have been excluded from this review.
This is especially true in the area of environmental
modelling and more especially in the area of global
warming where a large and continuous research effort
has taken place over the last 10 years. 1 Also, existing
1 For a full review and state of the art in models of climatic
change, see the various chapters of the OECD Workshop on Economic Modelling of Climate Change (OECD, 1998).

Table 1
List of models reviewed in this article
Model
Partial models
AGLINK

ESIM (European Simulation Model)

FAO World Model
FAPRI
GAPsi (Gemeinsame AgrarPolitik
Simulation)
MISS (Modele International Simplifie
de Simulation)
SWOPSIM (Static World Policy
Simultaion Model)
WATSIM (World Agricultural Trade
Simulation Model)
Economy-wide models
G-Cubed (Global Computable Genereal
Equilibrium Growth Model)
GTAP (Global Trade Analysis project)

GREEN
INFORUM (Inter-industry Forecasting
at the University of Maryland)
MEGABARE/GTEM
Michigan BDS (Brown-Deardorff-Stern)
RUNS (Rural-Urban-North-South)
WTO Housemodel

Initiating bodies (institutions and/or persons)

Key reference

Current Status

Organisation for Economic Co-operation and
Development (OECD)
US Department of Agriculture/Economic Research
Service, USDA/ERS, and University Giittingen,
Germany
Food and Agriculture Organisation of the United
Nations (FAO)
Food and Agricultural Policy Research Institnte,
Iowa State University
Bundes Forschungsanstalt fur Landwirtschaft
(PAL), Germany
Institut National de Ia Recherce Agronomique
(INRA), France
US Department of Agriculture/Economic Research
Service (USDA/ERS)
University of Bonn, European Commission,
Federal Ministry of Agriculture, Germany

See http://www.oecd.org/agr/
Documents/aglink98.pdf
Tangermann and Josling (1994)

Used

FAO (1993) and see
http/:www.fao.org/es/esc
Young et a!. (1999)

Used

Frenz and Manegold (1988)

Used

Mahe and Tavera (1989)

Not used

Roningen (1986)

Not used

Henrichsmeyer et a!. (1998)

Used

Used
:"11

Used

"'

1:>
;:,

C'

;:,

"""'~
;:,

~

,....

1:>

;;:

""~-

E..
i:'

~
~

"
;;
"~;:,

McKibbin and Wilcoxen, US Environmental
Protection Agency (EPA)
Purdue University, GTAP Center and GTAP
Consortium
Organisation for Economic Co-operation and
Development (OECD)
University of Maryland

Australian Bureau of Agriculture and Resource
Economics
University of Michigan
Organisation for Economic Co-operation and
Development (OECD)
The World Trade Organisation (WTO)

McKibbin and Wilcoxen (1999), and see
http://www.msgpl.com.au/msgpl/msghome.htm
Hertel (1997), and see
http://www.agecon.purdue.edu/gtap/
Lee et a!. (1994)

Used

N
0\

Used

-;::,

Used

.:::
,_

Almon (1991), and see http://www.
inform.umd.edu/EdRes/Topic/Economics/
EconData/lntpartn.html
ABARE (1996), and see http://www.abare.gov.au/

Used

'f'
,_

Brown et a!. (1992), and see
http://www.spp.umich.edu/rsie/model
Burniaux and van der Mensbrugghe (1990)

Used

Francois et al. (1995), and see http://www.
intereconomics.com/handbook/disk.htm

<::>
<::>

""'-

;::]

Used

Not used
Used

v:

!52

F. van Tongeren et al./Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

global trade models are increasingly taking environmental issues into account. In the same vein, we do
not intend to review the large body of work dealing
with the specification of environmental models which
is out of the scope of this review. 2

2. Evaluation criteria
This section introduces our set of evaluation criteria,
which are subsequently used to describe and compare
alternative modelling approaches. The set of criteria is
based on the recognition that applied modelling forms
a combination of theory and empirical data, both of
which deserve due attention in policy relevant modelling.
The general 'filter' for inclusion of models in the
current review has been that the model should
• be multi-region and global in nature;
• have relevance for agriculture, trade and natural resource based activities;
• be multi-commodity;
• have a medium term time frame (around 5 years);
• be an equilibrium model (i.e. not models that project
demand-supply gaps using primarily technical relations);
• be of recent vintage, and likely to be used in some
form in the 1990s;
• be an applied model, i.e. uses a combination of theory and empirical data;
• have a strong policy orientation.
2.1. Conceptual framework: definition and scope
2.1.1. Market equilibrium models versus
time series projection models
Although time series projection models have been
excluded from the list, it is useful to distinguish this approach from equilibrium models. Time series projection models attempt to forecast the future on the basis
of extrapolation of historical data. These models typically put more emphasis on the statistical behaviour
of time series data than on the economic theoretical
underpinnings of behavioural equations. A projection
model may, for example, project commodity supply
2 For a recent review of these environmental models, see Conrad
( 1999), and Faucheux and Levarlet ( 1999).

based on agronomic data on acreage and yields without taking into account farmers' responses to changing
market prices. For a discussion of this method and a
large scale application, see Alexandratos (1995). Another well known global model that relies heavily on
the projections method is found in Rosegrant et al.
(1995).
On the other hand, market equilibrium models contain the response (behaviour) of economic agents to
changes in prices (costs), and prices adjust so as to
clear markets. The objective of these models is the determination of equilibrium prices and quantities on (interrelated) sets of markets. 3 In a fully fledged global
equilibrium model, there will typically be endogenous
prices attached to world markets as well as domestic markets. This class of models is firmly established
within mainstream economics where the behavioural
response of suppliers and buyers is typically derived
from optimising assumptions: given a description of
the production technology, the supplier chooses a combination of inputs such that costs are minimised for
a given level of output. Given a description of consumer preferences, the buyer determines his preferred
consumption bundle such that his/her utility is maximised for a given level of his/her budget. Standard
assumptions include constant returns technology, homothetic preferences, and markets characterised by
perfect competition. While these basic theoretical assumptions underlie equilibrium modelling, the optimisation process is usually not modelled explicitly.
Rather, a reduced form approach is common, where
demand and supply are specified as functions of income, prices and elasticities.
Depending on assumptions made about the flexibility of production factors, equilibrium models can
be classified as short term, medium term or long term.
Short term (in the Marshallian sense) means that some
production factors are fixed, and are not allowed to
reallocate between alternative uses. The fixed factors
will typically be capital, agricultural land, and perhaps agricultural labour. Medium term models allow
3 This does not deny the existence and relevance of disequilibrium situations. Temporary shortages and excess supply situations
(which may, for example, arise as a consequence of price or quantity regulations) can very well be captured in equilibrium models,
for example, by allowing for stockpiling and depletion. The key
point is that these models catch market interactions in a coherent
and theoretically sound way.

F. van Tongeren et al. I Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

for reallocation of all production factors as response
to some exogenous events. Finally, long term models would also model endogenous capital formation.
Within the group of market equilibrium models, we
can identify partial and economy-wide models.
2.1.2. Representation of national economies:
partial versus economy-wide models
Partial models treat international markets for a
selected set of traded goods, e.g. agricultural goods.
They consider the agricultural system as a closed
system without linkages with the rest of the economy. Effects of the rest of the domestic and world
economy on the agricultural system may be included
in a top-down fashion by altering parameters and
exogenous variables. Partial models are in principle
able to provide much product detail. See also Meilke
et al. (1996) who give a summary of global partial
equilibrium models adapted to agricultural trade.
Partial models may be single- or multi-product.
Multi-product models are able to capture supply and
demand interrelationships among agricultural products. Most partial models include linear or log-linear
behavioural equations, which allows the representation of supply and demand relationships (responses)
prevailing in the markets under study. 4 They also incorporate into their supply and demand relationships
exogenous variables such as technical change, world
population and household income.
Partial models of international trade in agriculture
generally focus on trade in primary commodities. That
is, they capture agricultural supply, demand and trade
for unprocessed or first-stage processed agricultural
products without taking into account trade in processed food products, despite the fact that the latter
commodities represent an increasing share of world
trade.
The main area of application of partial equilibrium
models is detailed trade policy analysis to specific
products, which represent only a small portion of the
activities of the economy in question. This (small sector) condition implies that policy-induced changes on
4 Some (single country) partial equilibrium modellers attempt to
overcome the shortcomings that are implied by linear and log-linear
behavioural equations by estimating flexible functional forms. See,
e.g. Frohberg et a!. (1997). To our knowledge this has not yet
been applied in global trade models, however.

153

the rest of the economy (outside the farm sector) are
so small that they can safely be ignored.
On the other hand, economy-wide models provide
a complete representation of national economies,
next to a specification of trade relations between
economies. A first step in moving from partial equilibrium to economy-wide modelling is to introduce
supply and demand equations for an aggregate residual commodity. By imposing regularity restrictions
on the supply and demand elasticities of the amended
model, one obtains a model that includes demand and
supply interactions between agricultural commodities and other commodities in a consistent way. A
fuller economy-wide specification is obtained when
the model is closed with respect to the generation of
factor income and expenditures, which requires the
explicit specification of factor markets for land, labour
and capital. In other words, the essential general
equilibrium features are captured by including factor movements between sectors, next to allowing for
demand interactions. Economy-wide models capture
implications of international trade for the economy
as a whole, covering the circular flow of income and
expenditure and taking care of inter-industry relations.
There are three broad classes of economy-wide
models: macro-econometric models, input-output
models and applied general equilibrium (AGE) models. Macro-econometric models do not concern us
here, since they will not zoom in on agriculture, but
rather are concerned with macro-economic phenomena such as inflation and exchange rates. Input-output
models provide a comprehensive description of
inter-industry linkages and a full accounting of primary incomes earned in production activities.
AGE models do also usually contain full inputoutput detail, but on top of that they contain equations
that describe the behavioural response of producers,
consumers, importers and exporters and possibly other
agents in the economy. 5 AGE models are specifically concerned with resource allocation issues, that
is, where the allocation of production factors over
alternative uses is affected by certain policies or exogenous developments. International trade is typically
an area where such induced effects are important
5 Limitations of open Leontief input-output models include fixed
prices, exogenous final demand, perfectly elastic factor supplies,
and an inability to demonstrate welfare effects.

154

F. van Tongeren et al./Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

consequences of policy choices. Needless to say, such
induced effects are not visible in partial models. In the
face of changing international prices, resources will
move between alternative uses within the domestic
economy, or even between economies if production
factors are internationally mobile. Only if a complete
description of the multi-sectoral nature of the economy is provided, can such developmental issues be
analysed.

2.1.3. Regional scope
Multi-region models differ with respect to their
regional coverage. 6 Global trade models attempt
a closed accounting of the selected commodity
trade flows for the entire world. If the model is
economy-wide, the global model also includes a
globally closed income accounting system. At the
other end of the scale, a model might focus on
trade between a selected set of trading partners,
without attempting a globally closed accounting.
Or it might even single out one group of countries,
such as the EU-15, and describe its trade on world
markets.
A globally closed database does not imply that all
regions or countries distinguished are treated with the
same amount of detail. An intermediate position is
frequently adopted, wherein the model's database is
closed with respect to the world, but only selected
regions are treated with a great amount of detail, and
confining the description of other regions to a smaller
range of variables that are of crucial importance.
2.1.4. Linked individual country models or
parametric differences between regions
There are two broad approaches with respect to the
modelling of individual economies within the global
economic system. One approach starts by giving a detailed representation of individual economies, taking
into account much of the institutional and economic
details of the individual countries, and subsequently
linking individual country models through trade flows,
6 In accordance with the international trade literature, 'regional'
has a supra-national meaning in this report, and not an intranational (provinces, etc.) one. A 'country' corresponds to the
notion of a nation state. Whenever this article refers to regions, we
mean an aggregate of individual countries. Regional aggregations
of countries, therefore, do not necessarily represent a coherent
geographical space, for example, a 'Rest of the World' region.

capital flows and possibly factor mobility between
countries. 7
The other route to global modelling starts by
assuming the same modelling structure for all individual economies, and representing differences
between economies in terms of data and parameters
only. This approach yields a relatively transparent
model structure, since there is only one economic
model. This in turn greatly facilitates both the data
handling aspects as well as the interpretation of results. In the linked country models approach, the
individual country models may be based on different
theoretical assumptions, which may make it difficult
to disentangle model results into the effects of exogenous events on the one hand and differences in
theories on the other hand. A disadvantage of the
'one model fits all' approach is clearly its limited
capability to handle structural differences between
economies. 8
2.2. Specification and modelling issues

2.2.1. Dynamic versus comparative
static specifications
Dynamic models allow the analysis of lagged transmissions and adjustment processes over time. Alternatively, the comparative static approach studies the
differences between equilibria resulting from different
assumptions on exogenous data or policy variables.
The time path between equilibria is ignored in comparative static models.
Dynamic models can be used to trace the accumulation of stock variables, whereas static models
are unable to do this. In comparative static models,
policy changes have no effect on the accumulation of
stocks - e.g. capital stock - and the associated
changes in production possibilities. For short-run
agricultural analysis the implications of accumulating
commodity stocks may be relevant as well.
Dynamic features can be incorporated in equilibrium models in several ways. The most frequently
used approach is to specify a recursive sequence of
7 The United Nations Project LINK (Klein and Su, 1979) is a
well known example of this approach to global modelling.
8 An intermediate approach has been followed by the GLOBUS
model (Bremer, 1987), which included three prototypical model
structures for, respectively, developed market economies, centrally
planned economies and developing economies.

F. van Tongeren et al. I Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

temporary equilibria. That is, in each time period the
model is solved for an equilibrium, given the exogenous conditions prevailing for that particular period.
In between periods, stock variables are updated, either exogenously (e.g. population) or as a result of the
equilibrium outcomes of the preceding period (e.g. investment demand leading to a changed capital stock in
the next period). Recursive dynamics do not guarantee
time-consistent behaviour. In contrast, in intertemporal equilibrium models agents display optimal
behaviour over time as well as within periods.
Intertemporal models are usually tantamount to
using rational expectations assumptions. 9 Such
forward-looking behaviour leads to equilibrium time
paths that move towards a long-run steady state (if
it exists). A main reason to incorporate such intertemporal features into general equilibrium models is the desire to model savings rates endogenously, and hence to allow the model to generate
alternative (endogenous) growth rates. In such models, a policy change can have a lasting effect on
the economy's growth rate through changes in the
accumulation of capital stocks. A feature which
is impossible with a fixed savings rate assumption. 10
Comparative static models are sometimes used to
generate projections of policy impacts at some future
point in time. Such projections are not to be confused
with econometric forecasts, but are achieved by constructing an artificial future dataset that is consistent
with the model's assumptions- a so-called baseline
- and subsequently conducting a policy experiment
on the basis of this projected dataset. The artificial future dataset is constructed by making assumptions on
the growth of exogenous variables and parameters and
subsequently letting the model solve for an equilibrium that is consistent with these assumptions. Typical projections with AGE models rely on exogenous
forecasts of GDP, factor endowments and factor productivity.
9 Furthermore, by modelling the intertemporal equilibtium behaviour of economic agents, as well as equilibria within periods,
such models are able to counteract the Lucas (1976) critique on
economic models.
10 If knowledge is included as a production factor that can be
accumulated, growth rates become endogenous, even with a fixed
savings rate (see endogenous growth literature, for example, Grossman and Helpman (1991)).

155

2.2.2. Modelling of international trade

2.2.2.1. Assumptions concerning the nature of traded
goods: homogeneous versus heterogeneous goods.
In classical trade models, goods are assumed to be
similar in the eyes of buyers. In such a market, the
goods of one producer perfectly substitute for those
of another and are called homogeneous. If the number of suppliers is sufficiently large, the market will
approach the perfect competitive outcome and prices
across suppliers will be equalised. Homogeneity and
competitiveness also imply that each actor in the
market is either a buyer or a seller of the good, but
never both, since each actor is either able to produce
the good with non-negative profits at the prevailing
market price or not. This implies that a country can
only be an exporter or an importer of a certain good,
and models that include this assumption describe only
inter-industry trade.
Homogeneity therefore simplifies the task of trade
modelling considerably. Since prices are equalised and
there is no other distinguishing characteristic of the
goods, it makes no difference from which supplier
a particular purchase is made. The homogeneity assumption is therefore associated with a 'pooled' market approach to trade modelling, where we see only
what each actor brings to the market (supply) and what
that actor takes from the market (demand). For obvious reasons, the pooled market approach is also known
as 'non-spatial' modelling.
However, these simplifications in modelling have
severe limitations for applied trade research, as these
models explain only inter-industry trade and not
intra-industry trade. The latter turns out to be an
important phenomenon in trade, since even at high
levels of disaggregation, countries report both exports
and imports in any sector. If intra-industry trade is
netted out, one ignores an important phenomenon of
the real world and underplays the importance of trade
to each region. Furthermore, these trade models can
be hypersensitive to changes in transportation costs
and trade policy wedges, and run the risk of extreme
specialisation when sector-specific factors of production are not present in the model, see also Francois
and Reinert (1997).
One way to introduce intra-industry trade in a
model is to assume that goods are distinguished by
other factors than price alone, and hence are viewed

156

F. van Tongeren et al. I Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

as imperfect substitutes from the perspective of the
buyer. When product differentiation is possible, goods
are called heterogeneous and the task of trade modelling is considerably more complex. First, there is no
need for prices to equalise across suppliers. If goods
are heterogeneous, then different buyers are willing to
pay different prices to obtain the same quantity of the
good. Hence, independent price movements among
suppliers are possible. Second, each actor in the market may be both a buyer and a seller at the same time
if goods are differentiated. This implies that the trade
model has to trace twice as many transactions than
under the homogeneity assumption. Clearly, the bilateral specification provides a richer and more detailed
picture of the market, but requires much more data,
parameters, bookkeeping and computational effort.
Whether the additional effort is justified by additional
relevant information depends on the kind of problems
a model has to tackle. Many policy disputes and policy instruments are bilateral in nature, and can only be
treated within a bilateral specification of trade flows.
There are two ways to incorporate product differentiation into applied trade models. On the one hand,
product differentiation can be introduced exogenously
by assuming that products are differentiated by country of origin. This method introduced by Armington (1969) simply assumes that imports and domestic
goods are imperfect substitutes in demand. The often
used Armington formulation in applied trade models
invokes the assumption that products are differentiated by country of origin. In combination with a preference function that is separable in domestic products
and combined foreign products, this yields empirically manageable import functions. Most often a CES
functional form for preferences is assumed. 11 This
assumption has received much criticism because the
source of product differentiation is exogenously introduced on the demand side. Another disadvantage of
this assumption is that terms of trade effects turn out to
be quite large empirically. The Armington assumption
implies that each importer, however small the region
may be, has some degree of market power, and is there-

In general, the assumption of (weak) separability of the utility function implies that 'bundles' of goods have to be identified,
where substitution is relatively easy within 'bundles' but substitution is less easy across 'bundles'. This is evidently also an empirical issue.
11

fore able to influences world prices. See Brown (1987)
for an analytical and numerical assessment of terms
of trade effects under the Armington assumption.
An alternative approach is to introduce product differentiation endogenously at the firm level on the supply side. 12 This approach assumes that consumers
prefer differentiated goods either to obtain a better
match between their preferred variety and those extant
in the market place (Lancaster, 1980) or to obtain increased variety in consumption (Spence, 1976; Dixit
and Stiglitz, 1977). Krugman (1979, 1980) and Ethier
(1979, 1982) introduced the concept of monopolistic
competition into international trade theory. In this approach fixed costs such as R&D or marketing costs
are necessary to produce differentiated goods. The inclusion of fixed costs has some implications for trade
policies. Next to the traditional gains from trade we
get 'noncomparative advantage' gains from trade in
the presence of scale economies and imperfect competition. First, shocks that increase output at firm level
result in positive scale effects. Second, there are gains
from trade in the form of increased variety (thereby
incurring fixed costs and reducing the sales of existing
firms). Thirdly, scale economies imply that the market can only support a limited number of firms, which
are consequently imperfectly competitive. Trade creates a larger market that can support a larger number
of firms and hence a greater level of competition. The
reduction in market power is called the procompetitive effect. The advantage of this approach is that it
locates product differentiation on the supply side and
it minimises terms of trade effects. A disadvantage is
that the absence of firm level data makes econometric
estimation of elasticities problematic (Winters, 1990).
2.2.3. Representation of policies
A careful representation of policies is an essential component of global models applied to practical
agricultural and trade issues. The policies considered
cover not only trade policies but also domestic agricultural policies which add further distortions between
international and domestic prices. Modelling policy
12 Berkum van and van Meijl (2000) give an elaborate survey of
determinants of international trade, such as factor endowments,
product differentiation, economies of scale and innovation, and
their implications for trade patterns and trade policies. Furthermore,
they survey empirical evidence on the relevance of various theories
for explaining trade in agricultural and food products.

F. van Tongeren et al./ Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

157

price distortions caused by the quota. There are several
methods to quantify quotas and other non-tariff measures (Laird, 1997), which basically amount to two alternative ways to implement them in applied models:
the first is a tariff equivalent representation, while the
second method specifies quantity restrictions directly.

instruments in global models can take two forms. The
first one consists of developing a direct structural representation of the policy instruments through the incorporation of its mechanisms. The second approach is
more indirect and measures the policy-induced distortions through a price-transmission (policy-response)
relationship linking international and domestic
prices. 13 Depending on the values taken by this relationship, it is flexible enough to capture a wide array
of trade and domestic agricultural policy regimes
ranging from a perfect transmission of world prices
to perfect insulation. Measures of distortions captured by price wedges and/or tariff equivalents are
incorporated into this policy response function.
In the global models under review, these two forms
of representing policies are being used extensively.
Concerning the price transmission specification, the
most common form of modelling policy instruments
is the perfect transmission case with price wedges and
or tariff equivalents. This form is relatively easy to implement. In what follows, we illustrate the modelling
of policy instruments through two trade policy instruments: tariffs and quantitative restrictions.
Tariffs and quantitative restrictions such as quotas and voluntary export restraints (VERs) are two
types of trade policy instruments that are examined
in applied trade models. Tariffs can be introduced in
a straightforward manner and are most of the time
expressed as the percentage by which the domestic
price exceeds the world price; i.e. an ad valorem tariff rate. Quotas are more difficult to implement. First,
one has to investigate whether a quota is binding or
not. Second, it is difficult to assess what would be the
level of imports without the quota. Third, one has to
model who appropriates the rents that accrue from the
quota: domestic importers or foreign exporters. With
regard to the second element researchers focus on the

2.2.3.1. Tariff equivalents or price wedges. The tariff equivalent or price wedge of a non-tariff measure is
the difference between the free world price of a good
and the price on the domestic market. These measures
can be relatively easily be observed when goods are
homogenous and free world prices can be obtained
from transaction values. For manufactured goods, the
former is a problem and for many (agricultural) commodities the latter is a problem. A popular method
to arrive at estimates of tariff equivalents is use of
producer support estimates (PSE). 14 A disadvantage
of these subsidy equivalents is that they vary considerably from year to year, not only through changes
in policies but especially through changes in world
prices, exchange rates and the value of domestic production.
The representation of quantity restrictions as price
wedges is not always an adequate approach. If a quota
is not binding in the benchmark, its tariff equivalent
will be equal to zero. However, the quota may become
binding as the result of a policy simulation. This effect
will not be captured when the quota is approximated
by a tariff equivalent because the tariff equivalent remains zero. Additional complications arise in the case
of multi-tier protective schemes like tariff-rate quotas
(TRQs). These schemes specify different tariff rates
for different import quota levels, and it has to be determined whether each quota is really binding and/or
the tariff is prohibitive. Also, the implementation of
a quota implies the generation of quota rents, which

13 For more details on the specification and implementation of
price transmission equations, see Tyers and Anderson (1992,
Chapter 2). Price transmission equations can also be viewed as
reduced-form relationships obtained from a structural "political
economy" model explaining the behaviour of policy decision makers who optimise a policy preference (social utility) functions
subject to economic and political constraints. The empirical implementation of price transmission equations is often pragmatic
and not necessarily derived in a consistent fashion from the underlying political economy model. This could explain why such a
specification of policies is not used in global computable general
equilibrium models.

14 PSEs were formerly known as 'producer subsidy equivalents'.
These include the transfer from price distortions (i.e. price wedges),
and the transfers from government to producers. The transfer from
price distortions or market price support is again the transfer from
consumers to producers in the form of price gaps between domestic and world prices. The transfer from government expenditures includes both direct government payments and indirect transfers (e.g. input subsidies, tax concessions). The consumer subsidy
equivalent (CSE) measures the implicit tax or subsidy imposed on
consumers. See Cahill and Legg (1990) for a comprehensive description. Both PSEs and CSEs are regularly published by OECD.

158

F. van Tongeren et al./ Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

accrues as income to the holder of the right to import
or export under the quota. The endogenous determination of quota rents and their distribution over holders
of quota rights can only properly be captured by an
explicit representation of these policy measures. See,
for example, DeMelo and Tarr (1992) for a discussion
of trade quota instruments.

2.2.3.2. Other policy instruments. Next to border
protection instruments stricto sensu, other relevant
policies frequently need to be represented in models.
For example, in relation to the GATT/WTO commitments, ceilings on the volume of subsidised exports
as well as bounds on the value of export subsidies
may be relevant. In relation to the common agricultural policy (CAP) of the European Union, land
set-aside and headage premiums are clearly examples
of agricultural polices that do not directly affect border protection, but nevertheless do have an impact on
trade flows.
2.2.4. Theoretical consistency
Judging the theoretical consistency of models has
many facets, and the discussion here is far from
exhaustive. 15 At its most basic level, a model's numerical results should be qualitatively in accordance
with the theoretical foundations on which the model
has been erected. At the level of numerical implementation of the model, theoretical consistency places
requirements on the parameters used in functional
forms, especially parameters used in demand systems
and supply equations. 16
15 It is not a straightforward task to develop a sound set of criteria
to judge the theoretical consistency of models. This theme is also
closely related to the issue of model validation, which we have
not taken up in this article. In addition the evaluation of theoretical validity would require much more information on the individual models than is available. Since numerical model outcomes
are contingent on the particular set of assumptions employed, in
particular policy assumptions and assumptions on exogenous variables, a judgement of the numerical validity would require a study
where model results are compared against the background of the
same set of assumptions.
16 The four essential properties of demand functions are: (I)
adding up: at the given level of prices and income, demand equals
total expenditure, (2) homogeneity: compensated (Hicksian) demand is homogeneous of degree zero in prices and uncompensated (Marshallian) demand is homogeneous of degree zero in
income and prices together, (3) symmetry: cross-price effects are

Imposing all regularity conditions on the parameters used in demand system and the supply equations
of global partial equilibrium models is almost an insurmountable task. To overcome this problem, global
partial equilibrium modellers have adopted the following two strategies: (i) ensure that all parameters (elasticities) satisfy the essential regularity conditions (i.e.
that own price effects have the right signs and dominate the cross-price effects) and/or (ii) impose the full
set of regularity conditions to small components of the
global model.
The economic structure of general equilibrium
models forces the model builder to exercise a strict
discipline with regard to the restrictions on parameters. In particular, a necessary condition for the
existence and uniqueness of an equilibrium solution
is that all excess demand functions are homogeneous
of degree zero in prices. This condition is met when
the regularity conditions on demand and supply equations are satisfied. In a properly designed general
equilibrium model, equality between incomes and expenditures will always be satisfied for the economy as
a whole. This feature does not always hold for partial
equilibrium models because they lack the restrictions
imposed by an economy-wide national accounting
framework.

2.2.5. Model closures
'Closing' the model is the process of classifying the
variables as either endogenous, i.e. values are determined (solved for) by the model, or exogenous, i.e.
predetermined outside the model. Model experiments
are conducted by introducing alternative assumptions
on exogenous variables.
Alternative model closures can also be employed to
construct different models from the same basic modelling framework. Multi-region models with a global
coverage can sometimes be transformed into single
region models by singling out one specific region
and declaring 'the rest of world' as exogenous. Similarly, economy-wide models can be transformed into
symmetric, (4) negativity: the matrix of own- and cross-price
derivatives of compensated demand functions is negative
semi-definite. In particular this implies that (a) compensated demand function slope downward, and (b) own price effects dominate cross-price effects. See, for example, LaFrance (1986) and
LaFrance and Hanemann (1989). Similar observations hold for
equation systems used to model the supply side.

F. van Tongeren et al./Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

partial models of selected sectors, by specifying a
closure which holds 'the rest of the economy' as exogenous. The latter possibility is especially useful if
one wants to compare partial equilibrium outcomes
against general equilibrium outcomes, thereby checking for the presence of significant economy-wide
induced effects following a certain policy change
targeted at the agricultural sector.
There are certain general closure rules that have
to be fulfilled by both partial and general equilibrium models. Both in a partial and a general equilibrium setting, a valid closure has to assure that
the number of endogenous variables is equal to the
number of equations. In addition to this necessary
technical condition, the closure must specify a valid
economic environment. For example, if the equilibrium model demands that all buyers exhaust their
budget, the closure must be such that all buyers
are on their budget constraint, and that there are
no 'leakages' with respect to incomes and expenditures.
Since partial models describe only a subsystem of
the economy, they do not have to be concerned about
the so-called 'macroeconomic closure', i.e. the treatment of the link between investment and savings. In
models without intertemporal decision making with
respect to investments, the identity between macroeconomic investment and savings is guaranteed by
fixing either one at some pre-specified level, and
requiring the other variable to accommodate. For example, a so-called 'Keynesian closure' specifies an
exogenous investment level and lets savings adjust
endogenously. On the other hand, in 'neo-classical
closures', investment is adjusting to savings levels.
Since the source of savings may be both domestic
and foreign, the closure rule also has implications for
the treatment of the current account balance. If the
trade balance is fixed exogenously, one essentially
also fixes the difference between domestic savings
and domestic investments. In addition, in multi-region
economy-wide models, the approach of fixing trade
balances at the regional level is a simplifying way to
avoid modelling the allocation of global savings to
individual regions. A disadvantage of this approach
is the inability to model endogenous changes in the
volume of regional trade balances. It is obvious that
the specification of the macroeconomic closure can
have profound impacts on model outcomes.

159

2.3. Data and parameters
2.3.1. Data
Data requirements are very demanding for
multi-regional models of international trade. The
amount of data is determined by the level of desegregation (countries/regions, activities/commodities) and
the theoretical structure (homogeneous/heterogeneous
goods, bilateral/pooled markets).
Not only is the amount of data usually quite large,
but the data needed to be mutually consistent. Especially if trade is related to domestic inter-industry
structures, substantial adjustments to the published
data are necessary, because the procedures for collecting and classifying trade statistics differ from those
employed for domestic input--output tables. While
trade data with broad coverage are now widely available on a comparable basis, this is certainly not true
for input-output data and for trade protection information. 17 A social accounting matrix (SAM) usually
underlies economy-wide models. Although the SAM
is sometimes only implicitly present in the database
of AGE models, it forms the basis for a coherent
and consistent description of national economies. See
Laird (1997) for a description of widely used data
sources for international trade analysis. 18
It is obvious that regular updating of datasets will
improve the timeliness and relevance of results. The
choice of base year for a modelling dataset has additional consequences, both for comparative static and
dynamic models. The economic conditions that prevail at the point of reference determine the conclusions
that can be drawn from alternative simulations.
2.3.2. Parameters
The parameters used in behavioural equations determine the response to policy changes, and are therefore
a very crucial element in each modelling exercise. Key
parameters usually are: price- and income elasticities
17 A recent joint initiative by USDAIERS, Agriculture and Agrifood, Canada, the European Commission, UNCTAD, FAO and
OECD develops a new Agricultural Market Access Database
(AMAD). At the time of writing this contains tariff-line level
data on market access commitment and implementation of about
50 WTO members. AMAD is publicly available since September
2000. See Waino et al. (2000) and www.amad.org.
18 The annex to van Tongeren and van Meijl (1999) lists the
datasources of individual models in some detail.

160

F. van Tongeren et al./ Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

and budget shares in demand systems; substitution
elasticities and input cost shares in supply systems;
Armington (substitution) elasticities in import demand; if economies of scale are included, parameters
that capture the degree of exhaustion of returns to scale
(cost-disadvantage ratio). As already mentioned above
in Section 2.2.4 the values of these parameters must
be determined in consistency with data and theory.
Two approaches to estimating model parameters
can be distinguished: econometric estimation and
calibration. Econometric estimation of parameters
should ideally be done by simultaneous equation estimation methods that take into account the overall
model structure. However, given the size of applied
trade models, identification problems, lack of data,
etc., this is not feasible, and one has to resort to
single-equation estimation methods, using either time
series or cross-section data. See Jorgenson (1984) for
econometric estimation of AGE models.
Most applied trade modellers resort to calibration
methods - also called the 'synthetic approach' to generate a set of parameters that is consistent with
both the benchmark data and the model's theory. The
calibration approach takes initial estimates of elasticities, etc., from outside sources and adjusts certain
other parameters in the given functional forms to the
initial equilibrium dataset. Calibration, therefore, exploits theoretical restrictions, equilibrium assumptions
and assumptions on functional forms to arrive at a
point estimate.

3. Model overview
3.1. Partial models
In this section we describe the features of the selected partial equilibrium models. We first describe the
design choices of a prototypical standard multi-region
partial equilibrium model. This standard model will
serve as a point of reference for the individual partial equilibrium models. Individual models are summarised in alphabetical order in Table 2, which also
identifies their non-standard features.
A standard partial equilibrium model has the following features:
• regional scope: global coverage;

• regional unit of analysis: parametric differences
between countries;
• dynamics: comparative static;
• modelling of trade: homogeneous goods;
• characterisation of global markets: pooled markets;
• representation of policies: ad valorem price wedges
(trade: tariff equivalents);
• theoretical consistency: not implied by theoretical
structure; 19
• model closures: factor markets and non-agricultural
sectors are exogenous.
The standard multi-region applied partial equilibrium
model framework consists of an economic structure
that includes for each region constant elasticity supply and demand equations which determine domestic
prices. The standard model is multi-product by nature to capture supply and demand interrelationships
among agricultural products. Therefore, supply and
demand equations are functions of own and cross
product prices. The interactions between the agricultural product groups are taken into account while
influences of factor markets and the rest of the economy are treated as exogenous. Supply and demand
relationships incorporate therefore exogenous variables such as population, household income and technical change. Each sector produces one homogeneous
good that is perfectly substitutable both domestically
and internationally. A region's international trade is
viewed as the difference between the regions' supply
and demand and brought to the world market (pooled
approach, no bilateral trade). For each product, world
market clearing price balances global trade. World
prices for each product feed back into domestic prices
through a set of equations which specify wedges between world price and domestic price. All policies
are inserted as ad valorem price wedges. Finally, the
19 Generally speaking, the specification of supply and demand
relationships in all selected partial equilibrium models has been
conducted in such a way that the own price effects always dominate
cross-price effects. In some cases, the homogeneity condition might
have been imposed. Some partial equilibrium models may satisfy
for some of their components regularity conditions implied by
economic theory. Given the large size of most of these partial
equilibrium models, it has been impossible to undertake a full
screening of all their supply and demand relationships and to
check whether they satisfy all the regularity conditions. However,
when documentation on these models permits, we identified the
components which satisfy regularity conditions.

Table 2
Model summary of partial equilibrium models of trade in agricultural products
Description

Standard
model

Static partial
equilibrium model,
global coverage, no
factor markets

Modelling
of trade

Goals

Key

applications

Homogeneous
good

Policy
Representation

Number of
regions (r) or
countries (c)

coverage?

Global

Number of
sectors/

(yes/no)

products

11 (c) +2 (r)

Yes

19

Number of farm
(!) or processed
(p) products

Software

6 (!) + 13 (p)

SIMPC

Data
availability
(yeS/no)

Price wedges

+ pooled

markets

included
AGLINK

ESIM

FAO
World
Model

FAPRI

Recursive dynamic
model includes land
allocation

Standard model, land
market included,
special emphasis to
Eastern Europe
Recursive dynamic
model includes land
allocation

Econometric
recursive dynamic
model, with a special
emphasis on the US

Standard

To assist the OECD

Standard

Secretariat in its
annual medium term
outlook. Conduct
quantitative analysis
agricultural policies
on principal
agricultural markets
Enlargement studies

Quantity restrictions
modelled exp1icitly

Yes

~

"'"'

;>

EU enlargement

Quantity restrictions
modelled explicitly

7 (c) +2 (r)

Yes

Standard

147 (c)+ 1 (r)

Yes

27

17(!)+10(p)

Spreadsheet
(Supercalc
5.5 or Excel)

No

Fortran

No

~

;>

"""'Ol

;>

Standard

Standard

Medium- and/or
long-term projection
model. Simulating
impacts of policy
changes
Compound modelling
system for poJicy
analysis; short-,
medium and long
term projections
(1-10 years),
annual baseline

GAPsi

Recursive dynamic
model

Standard

EU agricultural
policy analysis

MISS

Standard model, four
regions

Standard

Analysis of
agricultural policy
changes in EU
and US

SWOPSIM Standard model

Standard: base
model,
Armington:
one
application

WATSlM

Standard

Standard model

Aunual OECD
medium term
agricultural outlook

Simulation of effects
of changes in
agricultural support
policies on
production,
consumption and
trade
Three target periods
with different aims:
short-term shock
analysis (not yet
available), mediumterm projections and
policy analysis,
long-term projections
and analysis of
various shift factors

To contribute to the
outlook of FAO on
agricultural commodity
markets, Uruguay
Round
Quantitative
evaluations of
(inter)national
agricultural policies
that affect US and
world agriculture,
farm legislation reform
through Uruguay
Round negotiations
CAP reform, Agenda
2000; planned: EU
enlargement, WTO
Trade liberalisation in
GATT framework and
CAP reform in game
theoretic setting,
focusing on EU-US
relations
Multilateral trade
liberalisation (GATI
Uruguay Round),
agricultural policy
reforms in US and EU

13

6 (!) + 7 (p)

~

,_

Standard

29 (c +r)

Yes

24

24 (!)

SAS-AREMOS,
Larus 123

No

"'
:;::
"""':::!.
1::

~

~

?;1

<:l
;>
<:l

;:!

c;·

Quantity restrictions
modelled expJicitly

13 (c) +4 (r)

Yes

13

13 (!)

GAMS, Excel
(output)

No

Quantity restrictions
modelled explicitly

1 (c) + 3 (r)

No

10 (final) +
10 (inputs)

10 (f) + 4 (non
agri-inputs)

Home made
software
(Language C)

Yes

'"'

"'

"'<::>
w
<::>
.::
.._
;:,..

'P
.._
Standard

(1) Baseline for years Quantity restrictions
2005, 2010, 2015 and modelled explicitly
2020, (2) analysis of
different shift factors
including income in
Asia, productivity in
transition countries,
(3) trade liberalisation

36 (r)

Yes

22

22 (!)

Spreadsheet
(Supercalc 3
or 5)

Yes

4 (c)+ 10 (r)

Yes

29

14 (!) + 15 (p)

ForLran, GAMS

Yes

t:::l

-0\

162

F. van Tongeren et al./Agricultural Economics 26 (200 I) 149-172

standard model is comparative static in nature. In this
paper the standard SWOPSIM model is an example
of a typical standard partial equilibrium model.
The standard partial equilibrium model can be modified to capture the following elements:
• possibility that policy instruments can be represented explicitly and in a detailed fashion;
• inclusion of autonomous shifters into behavioural
(supply and demand) relationships to generate projections.
In general, all the selected models are pretty close
to the standard model. They differ from the standard
model because they are recursive dynamic (AGLINK,
FAO World Model, FAPRI, GAPsi), endogenise land
allocation (AGLINK, FAO World Model, WATSIM),
model explicitly quantitative policies (AGLINK,
ESIM, GAPsi, MISS 20 and WATSIM) or include
bilateral trade by using the Armington assumption
(SWOPSIM, one application). Besides the design
choices the models differ in their product and country
coverage, which leads to a rather large differences in
focus.

3.2. Economy-wide models
As we did in Section 3.1 for partial equilibrium
models, we first define a prototypical model as a point
of reference against which the features of individual economy-wide models can be compared. Individual models are summarised in alphabetical order in
Table 3, which also presents their non-standard features. We choose as our standard a multi-region AGE
model, which has the following characteristics in terms
of the criteria introduced in Section 2.
A standard economy-wide model has the following
features:
• regional scope: global coverage;
• regional unit of analysis: parametric differences between countries/regions;
• dynamics: comparative static;
• modelling of trade: Armington;
20

The MISS and AGLINK models are the only two partial equilibrium models which are explicitly concerned about regularity
conditions in some of their components. For the former model,
supply equations satisfy the regularity conditions while for latter,
feed demand relationships are theoretically consistent.

• characterisation of global markets: bilateral trade
relations;
• representation of policies: ad valorem price wedges
(trade: tariff equivalents);
• theoretical consistency: implied by model structure;
• model closure: endogenous volumes and prices on
all markets, including factor markets. Exogenous:
factor endowments, policy instruments. Macro closure: 'neo-classical', savings driven investment at
global level (endogenous trade balance).
The main features of the standard multi-region
AGE model correspond closely to those attributed
by Baldwin and Venables (1995) to 'first generation'
models: comparative static, constant returns to scale
in production, perfect competition on all markets,
Armington assumptions for imports. In addition, our
standard model has a database with global coverage,
i.e. in principle global economic activity is covered. 'Standard models' included in this review are
RUNS, GREEN, GTAP and MEGABARE. Within
each regional economy of a standard multi-region
AGE model, inter-industry linkages are captured by
an input--output structure. Demand for factors of production is derived from cost minimisation, given a
sectoral production function (nested CBS) that allows
for substitution between inputs. Typically, substitution is allowed only between primary factors -land,
labour, capital - while intermediate inputs are used
in fixed proportion with output (Leontief technology).
Each sector produces one homogeneous good that
is perfectly substitutable domestically but substitutes
imperfectly with foreign goods (Armington assumption). Next to the binary distinction 'domestic versus
foreign', the multi-region nature of the model enables
a distinction of traded commodities according their
region of origin. That is, bilateral trade flows are captured. 21 Factor markets {or land, labour and capital
are included, endowments for these primary factors
are given and the factors are fully employed.
Labour and capital are assumed to be fully mobile
across domestic sectors, while land is imperfectly
21 One strand of AGE models uses, in addition to Armington style
imports, a CET transformation function that models the split of
domestically produced goods into exported commodities and those
destined for the domestic market. An advantage of this method is
that it dampens the size of terms of trade effects that emerge in
Armington models, see DeMelo and Robinson (1989).

Table 3
Summary of economy-wide models
Description

Standard
model

G-cubcd

Applied General
Equilibrium model,
multi-sector, comparative
static, constant returns to
scale in production,
perfect competition on all
markets, global coverage
Intcrtcmporal applied

Modelling
of trade

Number of

Global

regions (r) or
countries (c)

coverage sectors

Public
data

Yes/No)

availability

Number of Number of
farm (f) or
processed (p)
products

Software

General purpose

Yes

package

:.,
Standard

Standard (default version)
recursive dynamic and
imperfect competition
versions available

Standard monopolistic
competition versions
available

GREEN

Recursive dynamic

Standard, except crude
oil (homogeneous)

1NFORUM

Linked system of
dynamic national
macroeconomctric models
with inter-industry
input-{}Uiput linkages

Price and income
sensitive
econometrically
estimated import and
export equations

Recursive dynamic
endogenous population
growth, technology
bundles in electricity and
iron & steel

Standard

Michigan
BDS

Scale economics and
monopolistic competition
in manufacturing
industries

Monopolistic
competition

RUNS

Recursive
dynamic

The WTO
housemodcl

Standard and imperfect
competition versions

Agriculture:
homogeneous goods
& pooled markets,
manufactures: standard
Standard and firm level
product differentiation

a

Policy
representation

Ad valorem
price wedges

flows

macroeconomic model

MEG ABARE
and GTEM

Key applications

Armington, bilateral

general equilibrium and

GTAP

Goals

Contribute to the policy
debate on environmental
policy and international
trade, wilh a focus on
global warming policies

Trade policy analysis,
especially multilateral
liberalisation.
Agricultural policies
Asses the economic
impact of imposing
limits on carbon
emissions
Annual forecasts and
policy analysis at
national and
internationally linked
levels
Policy scenario analysis
primarily in climate
change but also in global
agricultural trade reform
and trade in strategic
commodities (e.g. coal)
To analyse
microeconomics effects
of trade liberalisation
policies

Analysis of agricultural
policies

To analyse global trade
analysis issues such as
the upcoming WTO
round

Economy-wide impacts
of greenhouse policies,
financial crisis in Asia.
global predictions and
outlook of the world
economy, Uruguay
Round
GA"n· Uruguay Round,
technological changes,
environmental policies;
EU enlargement, CAP
reform
Kyolo protocol
assessment

Standard and tradable
emission pennits

4 (c) + 4 (r)

Yes

12

1 (f)+ I (p)

Gauss

No

""

1:>
;:s

(;l

;:s
Oo

"';:s<ii

Standard in default
version, volume and
value restrictions
(quota, etc.) available
Standard, quota,
tradable emission
permits

27 (c) + 12
(r) +RoW"

Yes

50

12 (f) +8 (p)

GEMPACK and
GAMS versions
available

Yes,
at cost

~

"'

:-

"

~

Oo

5 (c) + 7 (r)

Early work on NAFfA,
national US studies
(LIFT), Austrian
integration in EU

Standard,
macro-economic
policy instruments,
taxes and transfers

13 (c)

Climate change policy
and the economic
impact of the Kyoto
protocol, WTO and the
agricultural trade
libcralisation
Regional trade
agreements (NAFTA,
extension of EU with
Eastern European
countries), Uruguay
Round, liberalisation in
services
GA1T Uruguay Round,
agricultural trade
liberalisation

Standard, tradable
emission permits

27 (c) + 12
(r) +RoW

Multi~region CGE
analysis of the results
of the Uruguay Round

Standard, import
quota

Yes

No

Yes

9

Varies by
country:
minimum
33,
maximum
!00
50

1 (f)

Varies by
country

C language

No

G language

Yes partly,
free

~·

;;..

"'~
~

a

g
'-!

c;·

"'N
12 (f) + 8 (p)

GEM PACK

Partly, Yes,
sec GTAP
energy
parts: No

0\

~

a
a

.::
.....
-k

Standard

34 (c) +RoW

Yes

29

2 (!)

GEM PACK

Yes

'f'
.....
;j

Standard

13 (c) + Y (r)

Yes

20

11 (f) + 4 (p)

5 (c) + 7 (r)
+RoW

Yes

19

3 (f)+ 1 (p)

Fortran

No

GAMS/MPSGE

Yes

Rest of world.
~

U-l

164

F. van Tongeren et al./ Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

mobile and tied to agricultural production. Consumer demand is derived from utility maximisation
under a budget constraint, and · consumers allocate
their expenditures over domestic and foreign goods.
A government actor levies various types of indirect
taxes and subsidies including import tariffs and export
subsidies. All policy instruments are specified as ad
valorem price wedges. All factor markets and commodity markets are assumed to clear, which yields
equilibrium solutions to factor- and commodity prices
as well as the corresponding equilibrium quantities.
All regional economies are linked through bilateral
commodity trade and through interregional investment
flows. As discussed in Section 2.2.5, there are different approaches to deal with this latter aspect. If one is
willing to assume a constant current account balance
in all regions, then the difference between regional
savings and investments is essentially predetermined,
and as a consequence the aggregate level of the savings - investment balance is also predetermined. If
one wants to allow for endogenous determination of
the current account balance, the standard model must
include a mechanism to redistribute aggregate savings
over regions.
We also classify under the heading 'standard model'
those which include a recursive sequence of temporary equilibria. 22 Recursive models do generate time
paths for endogenous variables, but there is in fact no
behavioural linkage between periods. As a result, the
equilibrium solution in each period can essentially be
calculated without reference to earlier or later periods.
'Second generation' models add increasing returns
and imperfect competition in some of the sectors, allowing for estimates of scale and variety effects, as
discussed in Section 2.2.2. These models are comparative static in nature. Examples included here are
the Michigan BDS and WTO models. In contrast,
'third generation' models include time consistent forward looking behaviour and endogenous savings rates,
hence allowing for the modelling of short run dynamics. The G-cubed model is an example of this brand.

22 The Baldwin and Venables (1995) 'first generation models' are
comparative static. However, single region recursive AGE models
have a long tradition, starting from the work of Adelman and
Robinson (1978) on Korea. While the standard recursive approach
allows for accumulation of capital stocks, investment behaviour is
not forward looking in these models.

Most of selected economy-wide models- whether
dynamic or static - share in common the fact that
theoretical consistency is met by adopting restrictive
structures for consumers' preferences and firms' technologies. Hence, the former are often represented by
explicitly additive structures while firms' technologies
are also specified using (nested) CES functions. With
the exception of GTAP, all the selected applied general
equilibrium models are specified with (nested) CES
functions, and linear expenditure systems. Less restrictive flexible functional forms have been proposed to
allow for different degrees of substitutability between
factors of production or between consumption goods
(see Patridge and Rickman (1998) for a discussion).
When incorporating flexible functional forms into an
AGE model, care has to be exercised that the parameterisation meets certain curvature properties to ensure existence and uniqueness of equilibria. The GTAP
model is the only one which attempts to adopt a less
restrictive structure to represent consumer expenditures. In fact, consumers' preferences in this model
are specified through a non-homothetic constant difference of elasticities (CDE) demand system (Hanoch,
1975) which allows budget shares to vary with income.
The standard, 'first generation' multi-regional
AGE model is a firmly established workhorse in
international trade analysis. While retaining most
of the standard assumptions, certain special features are introduced into some models to capture
specific issues, such as developing country agriculture (RUNS) or aspects of the EU' s CAP (some
GTAP applications). Recursive dynamic variations
of the standard model are now commonplace in
research in the field of global climate change
(GREEN, MEGABARE). Imperfect competition
versions have gained ground in trade liberalisation
of manufactures, and are likely to be used in the
assessment trade liberalisation in services (WTO,
BDS, GTAP). The most recent development is the
intertemporal modelling of macroeconomic interactions between financial markets and real sectors
(G-cubed).
The size of the data collection effort for global
models has in the past forced modellers to be rather
economical as regards the regional and sectoral disaggregation. Two collaborative efforts to reduce this
entry barrier exist to date: INFO RUM and GTAP. The
GTAP database is specifically tailored to the needs of

F. van Tongeren et al. I Agricultural Economics 26 (200 1) 149-172

general equilibrium modellers, and this has certainly
contributed to its wider usage, also by non-GTAP
modelling teams.

4. Assessment
We started this survey with the claim that no model
can serve all purposes. Following the criteria set out
in Section 2, Table 4 gives an overview of the design
choices made in the surveyed models, and serves as an
aid to get an overview of the current state of the field.
Eight out of the 16 surveyed models are partial
models, according to Table 4. Results obtained from
Table 4
Basic modelling design choices"
Total

Partial
Models

Economy
wide
models

Scope of representation
National economies
Partial
General

8
0

0
8

8
8

Regional scope
Global coverage
Non-global coverage

8
0

7

15

Regional unit of analysis
Linked country models
Parametric differences

0
8

7

1
15

Dynamics
Static
Recursive dynamic
Forward looking

4
4
0

3
4

7
8

Modelling of trade
Homogeneous
Armington
Monopolistic competition
Other

8
0
0
0

0
5
2

8
5
2

Treatment of quantitative policies
Tariff/price equivalents
3
Explicit treatment
5

5
3

8
8

Data: public data availability?
Yes
3
No
5

5
3

8
8

Parameters
Estimated
Calibrated

0
8

2
14

2
6

a The table refers only to standard versions of models.

165

a general equilibrium analysis will only differ significantly from partial equilibrium results if agricultural
trade policies lead to noticeable price shifts in other
sectors. However, in industrial countries agriculture
accounts for only a small share of GNP. Therefore, the
strength of the linkages of agriculture with other sectors is typically not very strong at the level of aggregation that AGE models tend to employ. An exception
may be those linkages than run through markets for
natural resources, especially land. In contrast, developing countries and countries in transition witness a
relatively high share of agriculture in economic activity. There are, therefore, significant second-round effects to be expected from polices that pave the ground
towards regional integration and multilateral trade liberalisation, and AGE models provide the only coherent
way to analyse these. More generally, policy changes
such as CAP reform and WTO agreements are associated with impacts that reach beyond the agricultural
sector and involve effects on factor markets for land
and labour, which can most fruitfully be studied in a
general equilibrium framework.
In industrialised countries, there do exist strong
linkages, however, with sectors that are closely related
to agriculture, either because they deliver key inputs
such as fertilisers, herbicides, agricultural machinery,
or because they process primary agricultural products,
such as beef processing and dairy industries. Highlighting such interdependencies within the agricultural
complex is one area where partial equilibrium models
can potentially be very successfully used, and some
of the recent partial models have taken up this challenge (WATSIM, ESIM). This aspect is also gaining
importance in the presence of dramatically increasing
trade shares of processed food products. Most of the
partial equilibrium models surveyed in this article do
not fully exploit this potential advantage because they
have a focus on trade in primary agricultural commodities. As a result, there has been a tendency to
use AGE models to highlight the forward and backward linkages within food supply chains, as well as
to incorporate trade in differentiated food products.
The majority of the models has a global coverage,
only one of them treats a regional subset of economies
(INFORUM). Within the group of models that closes
their accounting with respect to world trade, there are
differences in regional emphasis. FAPRI focuses on
the US, ESIM on Eastern Europe, MISS focuses on

166

F. van Tongeren eta/.! Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

US-EU interactions, GAPsi emphasises the EU. A
clear regional bias is less obvious in the economy-wide
models with a global coverage. All of them include at
least the major trading regions (US, EU, Asia Pacific).
The commodity coverage of partial models puts
more emphasis and detail on agricultural commodities. Most AGE models include only 1-3 agricultural
sectors. RUNS and GTAP are exceptions in this regard. The recent version of the GTAP database has
an amount of agricultural detail that is comparable to
partial agricultural models. 23
Only one of the models, INFO RUM, features linked
individual country models, while all others favour representation of differences between economies via differences in parameters. While in principle, individual country models can capture more regional economic and institutional details, there are clear difficulties with this approach in terms of consistency
and maintenance, see Section 2.1.4. Indeed, the linked
country models approach seems to be less sustainable, and their contribution to global trade analysis has
been rather limited. (The IIASA Basic Linked System,
Parikh et al., 1988; The project LINK, Klein and Su,
1979).
Comparative static modelling has certainly not gone
out of fashion, although eight models favour a recursive dynamic approach which permits them to generate time paths of variables and lagged adjustment
patterns. Forward looking time consistent behaviour
is only introduced into one model, G-cubed, which
does not have a specific agricultural focus, but concentrates more on macroeconomic phenomena. Explicit
introduction of time is certainly appealing to policy
users of models, since this relates the model outcomes
to concrete time periods. Comparative static models
have reacted to this demand by generating projections
without explicit modelling of the dynamics, see Section 2.2.1. While this procedure has some appeal, it
is also not free of criticism, and some caution should
be exercised. Partial models have to make assumptions on the development of a large number of exogenous variables to produce a projected future dataset.
In fact, the largest part of the projected future does
not derive from the model, but from outside assump23 At the time of writing, version 4 is the current version of the
GTAP database (McDougall et a!., 1999). Version 5 is expected
to become publicly available during 2000.

tions. Since the partial model itself does not provide
a consistency check, it is questionable whether these
assumptions are always consistent among each other.
Projections with static general equilibrium models do
provide a consistency check, but these models rely on
an extremely small number of assumptions for their
projections. This implies that a large part of the step
between two time periods is 'explained' by residual
factors such as total factor productivity (TFP) growth
rates which accumulate much of deviations not included in the original model. Finally, the features of
the 'baseline' in all dynamic models as well as in
projections are critical for the interpretation of policy
results which are obtained relative to the constructed
baseline scenario.
It is striking to note that all partial equilibrium models treat international trade in homogeneous products,
while AGE models deal with trade in differentiated
products by default. As already mentioned above, the
volume of trade in processed food products is increasing relative to trade volumes in primary commodities.
Since processed food can be considered to be of a
more differentiated nature than primary products, it is
highly relevant to come to grips with trade in differentiated products. By excluding intra-industry trade, and
limiting the analysis to net trade, partial models capture the degree to which countries are interwoven only
imperfectly. If net trade in a certain commodity turns
out to be zero, two economies are unduly qualified as
unlinked if in fact there exist intra-industry trade relations. These models also run the risk of predicting
the empirically contestable phenomenon of extreme
specialisation. Net trade in homogeneous goods also
makes it impossible to incorporate bilateral trade policies. While the standard treatment of trade in differentiated products follows the Armington specification,
two AGE models (BDS, WTO) incorporate firm-level
product differentiation and economies of scale by default, and the standard GTAP model has been amended
in that direction. These models focus on manufacturing and services, where these phenomena are perhaps
more relevant than in agriculture. However, in food
processing industries economies of scale and imperfect competition aspects are certainly relevant as well.
A related issue is FDI by internationally operating processing and retailing firms. This is as yet untreated
in the applied models surveyed, but does require the
recognition of economies of scale at the plant level

F. van Tongeren et a/. I Agricultural Economics 26 (200 I) 149-172

as well as at the firm level (Markusen and Venables,
1998). Scale and variety effects tend to yield 'large
numbers' in trade liberalisation studies. It must be
recognised, though, that hitherto the empirical basis
for these industrial organisation issues is rather weak.
Cross country econometric evidence on key parameters that measure scale economies are not yet available.
Eight models attempt to capture explicitly quantitative trade restrictions and CAP-type policies, and
eight of the models resort to a tariff-equivalent representation. Policies are typically formulated at the
commodity level or tariff-line level. It is at this level
that policy makers need information, and partial models are in principle able to get down to the required
level of detail, including specific institutional arrangements. Partial models, with their focus on selected
sectors, are in principle able to give a more precise
representation of policies, such as quantitative restrictions. However, our survey of partial model reveals
that some partial models under-utilise that potential and resort to a tariff-equivalent representation of
policies.
The inventory of models shows that some datasets
are used by different models. Usually, modellers adjust the raw data to suit their specific needs, and consequently some duplication of efforts occurs. Eight
modelling teams choose to make there dataset publicly
available, either free of charge or at cost. This practice, which is increasingly observed within the modelling community, is considered a very useful step as
it allows others to build on existing (and time consuming) work and it increases the transparency of modelling results. Sharing of databases has in the past
been hampered by well known public good problems,
which provide insufficient incentives for individual
teams to contribute to database development. The INFORUM network provides an early example of an institutional set-up that facilitates sharing of data. INFORUM contributors submit (input-output) data in a
form that matches their particular country model, and
does therefore not require major adjustments to a common standard. In contrast, the GTAP framework enforces uniform standards on regional data and trade
data. In addition, GTAP is supported by a strong group
of institutional stakeholders which puts high requirements on the quality, timeliness and documentation of
the data.

167

It turns out that 14 of the models surveyed here rely
on calibration methods, and take their initial parameter
estimates from the same published sources that sometimes date back a considerable time. Current models
are dominated by 'theory' over 'observations'. Econometric estimation of key behavioural parameters in
applied models is certainly an underdeveloped area,
although there are some initiatives to estimate partial models in consistence with micro-economic theory (ESIM, FAPRI). Recent developments in entropy
estimation methods may help to alleviate some of the
technical problems that one encounters in estimating
large scale AGE models with limited data (see Golan
et al., 1996).
Although not apparent from our earlier discussions,
documentation of models is generally weak and scattered, with some notable exceptions (BDS, G-cubed,
GTAP). Especially agency based models do not stand
out by clarity of documentation. Modellers that are
rooted in academia face stronger incentives to submit
their work to peer reviews, which increases transparency. An important related aspect is the accessibility of models and data to outside users, who do not
belong to the organisations or bodies which have (initially) financed or sponsored the development of these
models. While eight models offer the possibility to
obtain their datasets, the models themselves are often
proprietary. However, some of the models which are
presented in this review can be considered as 'public
goods' (conditional on certain costs and guarantees)
which can be used by or made available to interested
organisations or persons. Thus, the SWOPSIM model
developed by the economic research service (ERS)
of USDA has been made available to numerous academics who worked on the impact of agricultural
trade liberalisation. The OECD AGLINK model is
presently used by government services of OECD
member countries. A part of the INFORUM models
and modelling tools are in the public domain. At the
present time, GTAP represents the most far reaching
attempt to public availability, and has now several
hundred users in the academic community as well as
in research agencies all over the world.
Building an applied trade model is a costly exercise, which tends to require several man-years
of dedicated work on database construction, theory
formulation, parameter estimation and computer implementation. In addition, the size of the investment

168

F. van Tongeren eta/./Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

implies that the basic design choices are to a large
extent irreversible. Once a particular route has been
chosen, the switching cost may become prohibitive.
Some developments point towards a further reduction
in entry costs to this type of work: (a) convergence
towards standards in model building, where new models can build on established blueprints. (b) A major,
and seldom fully appreciated, part of model building
is devoted to database construction. GTAP has pioneered institutional innovations that lower the costs
associated with database construction and database
maintenance considerably. (c) The availability of
powerful general purpose software packages renders
it obsolete to develop own software to solve large
scale models numerically. Additional advantages of
using packages like GAMS, GEMPACK or GAUSS
is the transferability, reproducibility (and therefore
cross-checking) of models and ease of maintenance.
Early partial equilibrium models have been implemented in spreadsheets, which was top technology at
the time. Except for small scale models, and models
for pedagogic purposes, spreadsheet models do not
have much to commend them. They are inherently
difficult to maintain and are very error-prone.

4.1. Classification of the reviewed global models
The assessment of global models has been conducted in a qualitative fashion using the set of criteria
defined in Table 4. From this analysis, is it possible
to give a classification of these 16 models which distinguishes groups of models having the same profiles?
An attempt has been made here by identifying and ordering the set of criteria which discriminate best between the possible groups of models. In addition to the
clear distinction between partial and economy-wide
models, the other discriminating criteria are whether
the models are synthetic or econometrically-estimated,
dynamic or static, currently used or shelved and in
the case of economy-wide models whether they have
a global or non-global coverage and how they specify
international trade. 24 The results are presented in a
24 The classification process has been supported by a multivariate
factor analysis called 'multiple correspondence analysis' (MCA),
which is especially designed to process datasets consisting of
qualitative variables with several modalities (Escoffier and Pages,
1990). The coding and listing of variables (not presented in this

hierarchical tree-like diagram which provides an intuitive visual presentation of the model groupings.
Fig. 1 presents the classification of the 16 models.
Each branch in the figure is identified with the variable
which discriminates between groups. The hierarchical structure of models clearly distinguishes in a first
stage partial equilibrium from economy-wide models.
Within these two broad groups, several sub-groups
are easily identified. Looking first at the partial equilibrium model group, we can identify three pairs of
models. The first pair is made up of the FAO and
FAPRI models which are econometrically estimated
dynamic recursive models. Within the models with calibrated parameters, the second pair of models consists
of static models, such as SWOPSIM, WATSIM, ESIM
and MISS, and the third pair is made up of recursive
dynamic models, such as GAPSI and AGLINK.
A similar analysis of grouping can be conducted for
economy-wide models, where we observe that the INFORUM model stands on its own. As already observed
earlier, this model has a profile which is quite different from all other economy-wide models. Not surprisingly, the seven, remaining economy-wide models are gathered in groups which can be defined along
the classification of first-, second- and third-generation
models. Hence, the model G-cubed is the only third
generation model (forward looking behaviour) while
the pair formed by the models BDS and WTO are second generation models (imperfect competition). The
four remaining economy-wide models can be viewed
as first-generation models. Within the latter group the
standard GTAP model is static whereas the GREEN,
MEGABARE and RUNS models are recursive dynamic.

5. A modeller's research agenda
The distinction between partial- and general equilibrium models runs as a red thread through this article.
We have emphasised that both approaches have their
relative merits and are suited for certain policy questions. We believe that further improvements of both

paper but available upon request from the authors) used in this
multivariate factor analysis has been conducted using the criteria
developed in Table 4.

F. van Tongeren eta!./Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

169

GREEN

r--~ EGABARE

L___RUNS(*)

Static or
Static

G TAP

Armington
Forward looking

Global coverage

G CUBED
B DS
WTO

Imperfect competition

Economy-wide

Non global coverage

I NFORUM

Econometrically estimated

FAO
FAPRI

Partial equilibrium

I
I
I

Static
Calibrate~

s WOPSIM(*)
M ISS(*)
ATSIM
E SIM

--

G APSI
c=AGLINK

Recursive

(*):not currently used
Fig. I. Classification of reviewed global models.

types of models are desirable, and further research
efforts might be put into the following directions.
As far as partial equilibrium models are concerned,
the trade-off between pragmatism and theoretical elegance is currently biased towards practical usability.
Improvements of the theoretical structure of most
partial models are desirable, not only from a purely
academic point of view but also in order to avoid
misleading policy conclusions. For example, a model
that does not guarantee the equality between incomes
and expenditures because of an ad hoc treatment of
demand parameters is likely to lead to wrong conclusions. This is especially the case if the model is used
for longer term projections where income levels and
budget shares are likely to change substantially.
As far as the contribution to the current policy
debate is concerned, the partial models will need
to take up policy issues related to non-market interactions, such as the policy discussion around
multi-functionality of agriculture. This requires serious investigations into the modelling of positive and
negative externalities associated with agricultural activities. A related policy issue concerns the current
debate on decoupling of income support measures. In
their current form, none of the models reviewed here

is capable to shed light on the degree in which alternative income support schemes affect output, prices
or trade. As mentioned before, the current generation
of partial trade models focuses on trade in primary
or first stage processed agricultural commodities. In
view of dramatically increasing trade shares of processed, and differentiated, products, serious efforts
towards a more comprehensive modelling of the supply chain will enhance the usability of partial models.
Incorporation of bilateral trade flows opens the route
to modelling bilateral trade instruments, which are
of great importance in the upcoming round of multilateral trade negotiations. There is no way to model
TRQs without a bilateral trade specification.
In as far as partial models display a bias towards
pragmatisms, general equilibrium models have a
tendency to favour theoretical elegance over relevance to detailed policy formulation. The usability of
global general equilibrium models will be enhanced
if country specific institutional and policy details are
incorporated. Introducing more 'pragmatism' should,
however, not sacrifice their theoretical soundness,
which is a major advantage of this class of models.
Another potential area for improvement is the dynamic specification. For many questions, and for many

170

F. van Tongeren et al. I Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

users of model results, it is important to sketch the
time path towards a new equilibrium.
Within the general equilibrium modelling community large efforts are currently on-going in modelling
global environmental issues, such as climate change.
There seems to be scope for integrating economic
models with ecological models, and some experience
is already gained in this respect (Darwin et al., 1996;
Nordhaus and Zhang, 1996).

6. Concluding remarks

Ten years ago, the OECD and the World Bank convened a symposium that assessed the 'state-of the-art'
in agricultural trade modelling at that time, see Goldin
and Knudsen (1990). The field has changed over the
past decade, but to some extent the comments made
at this symposium can be echoed today. Probably the
most important innovations have not been theoretical,
nor have they been technological. The most significant changes have been of an institutional nature, albeit supported by recent computer and communications technologies. Ten years ago, models, data and
software were almost exclusively proprietary. Today,
it has become more common to exchange computer
code and to share databases. This tendency can be expected to be continued in the future. The 'open source'
concept that spurred rapid innovations in some parts
of the software industry may very well be the direction
towards which the global trade modelling community
is heading.

Acknowledgements

The authors would like to thank all persons who
contributed to this survey. This includes first of all the
members of the GTAP-EU concerted action project:
S!1lren Frandsen, Chantal Pohl Nielsen, Michael Strehr
(SJFI, Denmark); Martina Brockmeier, Dirk Manegold (FAL, Germany); Joseph Francois, Machiel
Rambout (Erasmus University Rotterdam/Tinbergen
Instiute, The Netherlands); Risto Vaittinen, Leena
Kerkela (Higher School of Economics and Business
Administration, Finland); Thomas Ratinger (VUZE,
Czech Republic); Kenneth Thomson (University of
Aberdeen, UK); Bruno Henry de Frahan, (Univer-

site Catholique de Louvain, Belgium), Akka Ait El
Mekki (Ecole Nationale d' Agriculture de Meknes,
Maroc); Luca Salvatici (Universita degli studi di
Roma La Sapienza, Italy), Paul Veenendaal (LEI, The
Netherlands). We also thank Rob Peters (European
Commission, DG-AGRI) for comments and fruitful
discussions. In addition we sincerely thank all individual researchers and modelling teams who shared
information on their models with us. This research has
been financially supported by the European Commission under the Fair-6 and Inco programmes (FAIR6
CT 98-4141). The content of this article is the sole
responsibility of the authors and does not in any way
represent the views of the European Commission or
its services.
References
ABARE, 1996. The MEGABARE model: interim documentation.
Australian Bureau of Agriculture and Resource Economics,
Canberra.
Adelman, I., Robinson, S., 1978. Income distribution policies in
developing countries: a case study of Korea. Stanford University
Press, Stanford.
Alexandratos, N. (Ed.), 1995. World Agriculture towards 2005. An
FAO Study, Food and Agricultural Organization of the United
Nations, Rome.
Almon, C., 1991. The INFORUM approach to inter-industry
modelling. Econ. Syst. Res. 3 (1), 1-7.
Armington, P.A., 1969. A theory od demand for products
distinguished by place of production. IMF Staff Papers 16,
159-178.
Baldwin, R.E., Venables, A.J., 1995. Regional economic
integration. In: Grossman, Rogoff (Eds.), Handbook of
International Economics, Vol. III. Elsevier, Amsterdam (Chapter
31).
Berkum, S. van, van Meijl, H., 2000. The application of trade and
growth theories to agriculture: a survey. Aust. J. Agric. Resour.
Econ. 44 (4), 505-542.
Bremer, S.A. (Ed.), 1987. The GLOBUS model. In:
Computer Simulation of Worldwide Polictical and Economic
Developments. Campus/Westview Press, Frankfurt and Boulder.
Brown, D.K., 1987. Tariffs, the terms of trade and national product
differentiation. J. Policy Model. 9, 178-203.
Brown, D.K., Deardorff, A.V., Stern, R.M., 1992. A North
American free trade agreement: analytical issues and a
computational assessment. The World Econ. 15, 15-29.
Burniaux, J.-M., van der Mensbrugghe, D., 1990. A
rurallurban-north!south general equilibrium model for
agricultural policy analysis. OECD Economics Department
Technical Papers no. 33, Paris.
Cahill, C., Legg, W., 1990. Evaluation de !'aide a ]'agriculture
au moyen des equivalents subvention a Ia production et a

F. van Tongeren et al./Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

Ia consommation theorie et pratique, Revue Economique de
l'OCDE, Vol 13. Numero special sur Ia modelisation des
consequences des politiques agricoles, pp. 16-46.
Conrad, K., 1999. Computable general equilibrium models
for environmental economics and policy analysis. In: van
den Berg, C.J.M. (Ed.), Handbook of Environmental and
Resource Economics. Edward Elgar, Cheltenham, Chapter 69,
pp. 1060-1089.
Darwin, R., Tsigas, M., Lewandrowski, J., Raneses, A., 1996. Land
use and cover in ecological economics. Ecol. Econ. 17 (3),
157-181.
DeMelo, J., Robinson, S., 1989. Product differentiation and the
treatment of foreign trade in computable general equilibrium
models of small economies. J. Int. Econ. 27, 47-67.
DeMelo, J., Tarr, D., 1992. A general equilibrium analysis of US
Foreign Trade Policy, MIT Press, Cambridge.
Dixit, A.K., Stiglitz, J., 1977. Monopolistic competition and
optimum product diversity. Am. Econ. Rev. 67, 297-308.
Escoffier, B., Pages, J., 1990. Analyses factorielles simples et
multiples. Objectifs, methodes et interpretation. Dunod, Paris.
Ethier, W., 1979. Internationally decreasing costs and world trade.
J. Int. Econ. 9, 1-24.
Ethier, W., 1982. Decreasing costs in international trade and Frank
Graham's argument for protection. Econometrica 50, 12431268.
FAO, 1993. The world food model- Model Specification. FAO
Mimeograph, ESC/M/93/1, Rome.
Faucheux, S., Levarlet, F., 1999. Energy-economy-environment
models. In: van den Berg, C.J.M. (Ed.), Handbook of
Environmental and Resource Economics. Edward Elgar,
Cheltenham, Chapter 73, 1060-1089.
Francois, J.F., Reinert, K.A., 1997. Applied Methods for Trade
Policy Analysis: A Handbook, Cambridge University Press,
Cambridge.
Francois, J.F., McDonald, B., Nordstrom, H., 1995. Assessing
the Uruguay Round. In: Martin, W., Winters, L.A. (Eds.),
The Uruguay Round and Developing Economies. Cambridge
University Press, Cambridge.
Frenz, K., Manegold, D., 1988. Lineares Modell zur Bestimmung von Preis- und Mengenwirkungen einer restriktiven
Agrarpreispolitik in der EG, Arbeitsbericht des Instituts fiir
landwirtschaftliche Marktforschung 88/1. Braunschweig.
Frohberg, K., Hartmann, M., Weingarten, P., Fock, A., Wahl,
0., 1997. The Central European agricultural simulation model
(CEASIM): an overview. Research Report of the Institute
of Agricultural Development in Central and Eastern Europe
(IAMO), Halle/Saale, unpublished document.
Golan, A., Judge, G., Miller, D., 1996. Maximum Entropy
Econometrics: Robust Estimation with Limited Data, Wiley,
Chichester.
Goldin, I., Knudsen, 0. (Eds.), 1990. Agricultural trade
liberalisation: implications for developing countries. Organistion for Economic Co-operation and Development, Paris.
Grossman, G.M., Helpman, E., 1991. Innovation and Growth in
the Global Economy. MIT Press, Cambridge.
Hanoch, G., 1975. Production and demand models with direct or
indirect implicit additivity. Econometrica 43, 395-419.

171

Henrichsmeyer, W., von Lampe, M., Mtillmann, C., 1998.
Weiterentwicklung und Andwendung des Welt-Agrarhandelsmodells WATSIM fiir Langfristsimulationen der Weltagrarmarkte sowie der Auswirkungen fiir die Landwirtschaft der
EU und der Bundesrepublik Deutschland unter Einbeziehung
des Modellsystems RAUMIS. Interim Report for the Federal
Ministry for Food, Agriculture and Forestry, Bonn.
Hertel, T.W. (Ed.), 1997. Global Trade Analysis: Modelling and
Applications. Cambridge University Press, Cambridge.
Huff, H.B., Moreddu, C., 1990. The ministerial mandate trade
model (MTM): OECD economic review, Vol. 13. Special issue
on Modeling the effects of Agricultural policies.
Jorgenson, D.W., 1984. Econometric methods for applied general
equilibrium modelling. In: Scarf, Shoven (Eds.), Applied
General Equilibrium Analysis. Cambridge University Press,
Cambridge (Chapter 4).
Klein, L.W., Su, V., 1979. Protectionism: an analysis from project
LINK. J. Policy Model. I (1), 5-35.
Krugman, P.R., 1979. Increasing returns, monopolistic competition,
and international trade. J. Int. Econ. 9, 469-479.
Krugman, P.R., 1980. Scale economies, product differentiation and
the pattern of trade. Am. Econ. Rev. 70, 950-959.
LaFrance, J., 1986. The structure of constant elasticity demand
models. Am. J. Agric. Econ., 543-552.
LaFrance, J., Hanemann, W.M., 1989. The dual structure of
incomplete demand systems. Am. J. Agric. Econ., 262-274.
Laird, S., 1997. Quantifying commercial policies. In: Francois,
J.F., Reinert, K.A. (Eds.), Applied Methods for Trade
Policy Analysis: A Handbook. Cambridge University Press,
Cambridge.
Lancaster, K., 1980. Intra-industry trade under perfect monopolistic
competition. J. Int. Econ. 10, 151-175.
Lee, H., Oliviera-Martins, J., van der Mensbrugghe, D., 1994. The
OECD Green model: an updated overview. OECD Economics
Department Technical Papers no. 97, Paris.
Lucas, R.E., 1976. Econometric policy evaluation: a critique. J.
Monetary Econ. 1 (2), 19-46.
Mahe, L., Tavera, C., 1989. Bilateral harmonization of EC and
US agricultural policies. Eur. Rev. Agric. Econ. 15, 325-348.
Markusen, J.R., Venables, A.J., 1998. Multinational firms and the
new trade theory. J. Int. Econ.
McDougall, R.A., Elbehri, A., Truong, T.P. (Eds.), 1999. Global
trade, assistance and protection: the GTAP 4 database. Center
for Global Trade Analysis, Purdue University, West Lafayette.
McKibbin, W., Wilcoxen, P., 1999. The theoretical and empirical
structure of the G-cubed model. Econ. Model. 16, 123-148.
Meilke, K., McClatchy, D., De Gorter, H., 1996. Challenges in
quantitative economic analysis in support of multilateral trade
negotiations. Agric. Econ. 14, 185-200.
Nordhaus, W.D., Zhang, Z., 1996. A regional dynamic
general-equilibrium model of alternative climate change
strategies. The Am. Econ. Rev. 86 (4), 741-765.
OECD, 1998. OECD workshop report on economic modelling of
climate change. OECD Headquarters, Paris, 17-18 September,
1998.
Parikh, K.S., Fischer, G., Frohberg, K., Guldbrandsen, 0., 1988.
Towards free trade in agriculture, Matinus Nijhoff, Dordrecht.

172

F. van Tongeren et al./ Agricultural Economics 26 (2001) 149-172

Patridge, M.D., Rickman, D.S., 1998. Regional computable general
equilibrium modeling: a survey and critical appraisal. Int.
Regional Sci. Rev. 21 (3), 205-248.
Roningen, V.O., 1986. A static world policy simulation
(SWOPSIM) modeling framework. Staff Report, Economic
Research Service, US Department of Agriculture, Washington,
DC.
Roningen, V.O., Liu, K., 1983. The world grain, oilseeds
and livestock (GOL) model - background and standard
components. ERS Staff Report no. AGES830317, Econ. Res.
Serv., US Department of Agriculture.
Rosegrant, M.W., Agcaoili-Sombilla, M., Perez, N.D., 1995.
Global food projections to 2020: implications for investment.
2020 Vision for Food, Agriculture, and the Environment
Discussion Paper 5, International Food Policy Research
Institute, Washington, DC.
Spence, M., 1976. Product differentiation and welfare. Am. Econ.
Rev. 66, 407-415.
Tangermann, S., Josling, T.E., 1994. Pre-accession agricultural
policies for Central Europe and the European Union Study
commissioned by DO I of the European Commission.
Giittingen.

Tongeren, F.W. van, van Meijl, H. (Eds.), 1999. Review of applied
models of international trade in agricultural and related resource
and environmental modeling. Agricultural Economics Research
Institute, Report 5.99.11 (EU-FAIR VI-CT 98-4148, Interim
report 1).
Tyers, R., Anderson, K., 1992. Disarray in World Food Markets:
A Quantitative Assessment. Cambridge University Press,
Cambridge.
Waino, J., Gibson, P., Whitley, D.B., 2000. Implementation of
Uruguay Round tariff reductions. ERS/USDA, Agricultural
Outlook, November 1999.
Winters, A.L., 1990. The role of partial equilibrium agricultural
models. In: Goldin, I., Knudsen, 0. (Eds.), Agricultural
Trade Liberalisation: Implications for Developing Countries,
pp. 453-454.
World Trade Organisation (WTO), 1998. Annual Report, Geneva.
Young II, R.E., Westhoff, P.W., Brown, D.S., Adams, G., Womack,
A.W., 1999. Modeling the world agrifood sector: the Food and
Agricultural Policy Research Institute approach. Paper Prepared
for The Agricultural Economics Society, Annual Conference
1999. Stranmillis University College, The Queen's University,
Belfast, 28 March 1999.

